Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1526.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 66.24.350 and 2025 c 343 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:There shall be a ((beer)) retailer's license to be designated as a snack bar license to sell beer by the opened bottle or can at retail, wine by the glass at retail, or both, for consumption upon the premises only, such license to be issued to places where the sale of beer or wine is not the principal business conducted; fee $187.50 per year.--- END ---